Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5707
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Producer-Controlled Property and Casualty Insurer Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 74.